Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 23 Wyoming Residential Mortgage Practices Act

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 2, authorizes two additional positions to the department of audit, division of banking for the purposes of implementing the act and appropriates from the financial institutions administrations account to the department of audit, division of banking $175,000 for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2006. A request of $350,000 from the financial institutions administrations account is to be included in the department of audit, division of banking's 2007-2008 biennium standard budget request for purposes of continuing funding of this program and these positions.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

§ 40-23-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Residential Mortgage Practices Act.”

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Borrower” means a person who has applied to a mortgage lender for a residential mortgage loan or on whose behalf the mortgage lending and mortgage brokering activities are conducted;

“Commissioner” means the state banking commissioner;

“Control” means owning twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting share of the licensee or having the power to direct the licensee’s management or policies;

“Division” means the division of banking within the department of audit;

“Licensee” means a company licensed under this act as a mortgage broker or a mortgage lender;

“Mortgage broker” means any company, who for compensation, or in the expectation of compensation, assists a person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan or holds itself out as being able to assist a person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan;

“Mortgage brokerage agreement” means a written agreement in which a mortgage broker agrees to assist the borrower in obtaining a residential mortgage loan;

“Mortgage brokering activities” means for compensation, either directly or indirectly, assisting or offering to assist in the preparation of an application for a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a borrower, or negotiating or offering to negotiate the terms or conditions of a residential mortgage loan with any person making residential mortgage loans;

“Mortgage lender” means any company, who makes residential mortgage loans to borrowers or holds itself out as able to make mortgage loans;

“Mortgage lending activities” means for compensation, either directly or indirectly, accepting or offering to accept applications for making residential mortgage loans;

“Person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other entity, public or private;

“Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act” means the act set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq., as amended;

“Regulation X” means regulation X as promulgated by the consumer financial protection bureau and codified in 12 CFR part 1024 et seq., as amended;

“Regulation Z” means regulation Z as promulgated by the consumer financial protection bureau and codified in 12 CFR part 1026 et seq., as amended;

“Residential mortgage loan” means a first mortgage loan made primarily for personal, family or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate in Wyoming upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling;

“Residential real property” means real property improved by a one (1) to four (4) family dwelling;

“Truth in Lending Act” means the act set forth in 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., as amended;

“Channeling agent” means the third party licensing system that gathers the application information and distributes it to Wyoming for review for the approval or denial decision;

“Clerical or support duties” means:

The receipt, collection, distribution and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

“Company” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other entity, public or private;

“Depository institution” means a company as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813 of the federal deposit insurance act, and includes any credit union;

“Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one (1) to four (4) units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. “Dwelling”, if it is used as a residence, includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home and trailer;

“Federal banking agency” means the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the comptroller of the currency, the director of the office of thrift supervision, the national credit union administration or the federal deposit insurance corporation;

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild, stepsibling and any adoptive relationship included in this paragraph;

“Individual” means a natural person;

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a licensee, or an exempt person under W.S.

40-23-105

;

“Mortgage loan originator”:

Means an individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain:

Takes a residential mortgage loan application; or

Offers or negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan.

Shall not include any individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise described in W.S. 40-23-124(d);

Shall not include a person who only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Wyoming law, unless the person is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator; and

Shall not include a person solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a thirty (30) year fixed rate mortgage;

“Real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor or lessee of real property;

Arranging meetings or communicating with any party interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property, unless the negotiating relates to the financing of these transactions, which shall then constitute engaging in the business as a mortgage loan originator;

Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C) or (D) of this paragraph.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who:

Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the registry; and

Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of:

A depository institution;

A subsidiary that is:

Owned and controlled by a depository institution; and

Regulated by a federal banking agency; or

An institution regulated by the farm credit administration.

“Registry” means the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry which is a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of state bank supervisors and the American association of residential mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage lenders, mortgage brokers and mortgage loan originators;

“Timeshare plan” means as defined in 11 U.S.C. § 101(53D);

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the registry;

“This act” means W.S.

40-23-101

through

40-23-133

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(v), substituted “company” for “person” and added “as a mortgage broker or a mortgage lender” at the end; in (a)(vi) and (a)(ix), substituted “company” for “person, other than those exempt under W.S.

40-23-105

” and substituted “itself” for “himself”; substituted “that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate in Wyoming upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling” for “and primarily secured by a security interest on residential real property” in (a)(xv); and added (a)(xviii) through (a)(xxxiii) and redesignated the remaining paragraph.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the definitions of “Regulation X” and “Regulation Z” in (a)(xiii) and (xiv) respectively.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-23-103.
Powers and duties of commissioner.

In addition to any other powers and duties imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner shall:

Perform any and all acts necessary to promulgate, administer and enforce the provisions of this act and any rules, regulations, orders, limitations, standards, requirements or licenses issued under this act, and to exercise all incidental powers as necessary to carry out the purposes of this act;

Order any mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator to cease any activity or practice which the commissioner deems to be deceptive, dishonest, a violation of state or federal laws or regulations or unduly harmful to the interests of the public;

Conduct investigations, issue subpoenas, and hold hearings as necessary to determine whether a person has violated any provision of this act;

Conduct examinations of the books and records of licensees and conduct investigations as necessary and proper for the enforcement of the provisions of this act and the rules promulgated under the authority of this act;

Issue orders that are necessary to execute, enforce and effectuate the purposes of this act;

Require that all application, renewal, licensing, examination and all other fees included under this act, except the amount paid for data processing by a nationwide mortgage licensing system and database, shall be deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer into the financial institutions administration account within the earmarked revenue fund;

Require the mortgage broker to reimburse the borrower for undisclosed or incorrectly disclosed fees pursuant to W.S. 40-23-114(d) and require the mortgage lender to reimburse the borrower for undisclosed or incorrectly disclosed fees pursuant to W.S. 40-23-113(e);

Require a background investigation including fingerprint checks for state and national criminal history record checks as necessary. The commissioner may utilize background checks completed by the division of criminal investigation, other government agencies in this state or in other states, the federal bureau of investigation or a nationwide mortgage licensing system;

Determine the content of application forms and the means by which an applicant applies for, renews or makes changes to a license under this act. The commissioner may require applicants to utilize a nationwide mortgage licensing system and database for the processing of applications and fees;

Establish fees authorized in this act in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “, except the amount paid for data processing by a nationwide mortgage and licensing system and database,” in (a)(vi); added (a)(vii) through (a)(ix), and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “mortgage broker, mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator” for “licensee” in (a)(ii).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

Cited in

CalCon Mut. Mortg. Corp. v. State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Audit, 2014 WY 56,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(May 5, 2014).

§ 40-23-104.
License requirements.

With the exception of those persons exempt pursuant to W.S.

40-23-105

, on and after July 1, 2005, no company shall engage in mortgage lending activities or mortgage brokering activities without first obtaining a license in accordance with this act.

A company engaged in mortgage lending or mortgage brokering activities with any dwelling located in Wyoming shall first obtain a license in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “company” for “person” throughout the section; and substituted “with any dwelling located in Wyoming” for “who advertises, offers or provides services to Wyoming residents through any medium including, but not limited to, internet or other electronic means” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-105.
Exemptions from license requirements.

The provisions of this act do not apply to:

Agencies of the United States and agencies of this state and its political subdivisions;

An owner of real property who offers credit secured by a contract of sale, mortgage or deed of trust on the property sold;

Any person licensed or chartered under the laws of any state or the United States as a bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company or an operating subsidiary of which the person owns or controls eighty percent (80%) or more of the voting stock;

An attorney licensed to practice law in Wyoming who is not principally engaged in the business of negotiating residential mortgage loans when the attorney renders services in the course of his practice as an attorney;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 3.

Any person who purchases or otherwise obtains a residential mortgage loan which has been originated, processed and closed with the borrower by a licensee or by an exempt person, who does not directly or indirectly solicit borrowers in Wyoming for the purpose of making residential mortgage loans, and who does not participate in the negotiation of residential mortgage loans with the borrower. For the purpose of this paragraph, “negotiation of residential mortgage loans” does not include setting the terms under which a person may buy or fund a residential mortgage loan originated by a licensee or exempt person after the residential mortgage loan has closed.

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 3; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(vi), substituted “purchases or otherwise obtains” for “funds,” inserted “and closed with the borrower,” added “after the residential mortgage loan has closed,” and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(v), which read: “Persons employed by or under contract with licensees on a full-time basis or persons who are employed by or under contract with no more than one (1) licensee on a part-time basis provided that any fees paid by borrowers are paid to the licensee or exempt entity and not to the employee or person under contract.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-106.
Initial licensing and compliance.

A person conducting mortgage lending or mortgage brokering activities, as of July 1, 2005 shall, not later than September 30, 2005, apply to the commissioner for a license.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

§ 40-23-107.
Application for license to do business as a mortgage lender or mortgage broker.

The commissioner shall receive and act on all applications for licenses to do business as a mortgage lender or mortgage broker. Applications shall be filed in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, shall contain such information as prescribed by the commissioner, shall be updated as prescribed by the commissioner to keep the information current, and shall be accompanied by an application fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for the home office location and an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each additional location, as set by rule of the commissioner. When an application for licensure is denied or withdrawn, the commissioner shall retain all fees paid by the applicant.

An application for license may be granted if the commissioner finds:

The financial responsibility and experience, character and fitness of the license applicant, of the owners or persons in charge of the applicant and individuals designated in charge of the applicant’s places of business, are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this act;

The applicant has not been convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven (7) year period preceding the date of the application for licensing, or at any time preceding such date of application if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust or money laundering;

The applicant has not been the subject of any administrative action or enforcement proceeding by any state or federal government agency involving the revocation of any license or authority substantially equivalent to a license under this act;

The applicant has not filed an application for a license which is false or misleading with respect to any material fact;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 76, § 2.

The applicant has provided information on the application as required by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; and

The applicant has not been convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to a misdemeanor in a domestic, foreign or military court involving an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust or money laundering.

The commissioner is empowered to conduct investigations as deemed necessary to determine the existence of the requirements in subsection (b) of this section.

Upon written request, an applicant is entitled to a hearing on the question of his qualifications for a license if:

The commissioner has notified the applicant in writing that his application has been denied, or objections to the application have been filed with the commissioner;

The commissioner has not issued a license within sixty (60) days after a complete application for the license was filed.

If a hearing is held, the applicant and those filing objections shall reimburse, pro rata, the commissioner for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of the hearing. Notwithstanding any provision under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, a request for hearing shall not be made more than fifteen (15) days after the applicant has received notification by certified mail that the application has been denied and stating in substance the commissioner’s finding supporting denial of the application or that objections have been filed and the substance thereof.

Every licensee shall license and maintain a home office as a principal location for the transaction of mortgage business. A separate license shall be required for each place of business from which mortgage brokering activities or mortgage lending activities are directly or indirectly conducted. The commissioner may issue additional licenses to the same applicant upon compliance with all the provisions of this act governing the issuance of a single license. Each license shall remain in full force and effect unless the licensee does not satisfy the renewal requirements of W.S.

40-23-109

, or the license is relinquished, suspended or revoked. Licenses shall be terminated upon the relinquishment or revocation of a home office license.

No licensee shall change the location of any place of business, consolidate two (2) or more locations, open a new location or close any location, without giving the commissioner prior written notice and paying a license modification fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) as set by rule of the commissioner.

A licensee shall not engage in the business of making or brokering residential mortgage loans at any place of business for which he does not hold a license nor shall he engage in business under any other name than that on the license without the approval of the commissioner.

The commissioner may suspend action upon a license application pending resolution of any criminal charges, before any court of competent jurisdiction, against an applicant which would disqualify that applicant if convicted.

An applicant shall make complete disclosure of all information required in the application, including information concerning officers, directors, partners, members, managers or employees.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “any aspect of the mortgage lending business, breach of trust or fraudulent or dishonest dealing” for “any aspect of the business” in (b)(ii); substituted “involving the revocation of any license” for “involving fines, penalties, or the revocation or suspension of any license” in (b)(iii); repealed former (b)(v), which read: “The applicant has not violated this act or any rule or order lawfully made pursuant to this act; or”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b)(ii), inserted “pled guilty or nolo contendere to” preceding “a felony” and substituted “in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven (7) year period preceding the date of the application for licensing, or at any time preceding such date of application if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust or money laundering” for “or misdemeanor involving any aspect of the mortgage lending business, breach of trust or fraudulent or dishonest dealing”; and added (b)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-108.
Change in control of a licensee.

A licensee shall give the commissioner written notice of a proposed change of control of a licensee within fifteen (15) business days after learning of the proposed change of control.

The commissioner may require the licensee to provide additional information concerning the proposed persons in control of the licensee. The additional information shall be limited to the same information required of the licensee or persons in control of the licensee as part of its original license or renewal application.

The licensee shall reapply and submit the required fees established by rule, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for a home office location and an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each additional location upon a change in the control of the licensee as determined by the commissioner. The license is not transferable nor assignable to the new persons in control of the licensee.

Before filing a request for approval to acquire control, a person may request in writing a determination from the commissioner as to whether the person would be considered a person in control of a licensee upon consummation of a proposed transaction. If the commissioner determines that the person would not be a person in control of a licensee, the commissioner shall enter an order stating the proposed person and transaction is not subject to the requirements of subsections (a) through (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

§ 40-23-109.
License renewal and annual report.

Each mortgage broker and mortgage lender license issued under this act shall expire on December 31. The license shall be renewed annually not less than thirty (30) days before the stated expiration date. The renewal fee for each license shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for the home office location and an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each additional location, as set by rule of the commissioner.

The renewal fee shall be accompanied by a report, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, which shall include:

Any material changes to any of the information submitted by the licensee on its original application which have not been reported previously to the commissioner on any other report required to be filed under this act;

Any update necessary on the surety bond;

Any update on civil or criminal proceedings against the licensee or any administrative or enforcement proceedings by any state or federal government agency involving fines, penalties or the revocation or suspension of any business licensee or authority substantially equivalent to a license under this act;

Any other information as the commissioner may deem necessary.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “December 31” for “June 30” in (a).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “mortgage broker and mortgage lender” preceding “license” in the first sentence of (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes.—

Laws 2008, ch. 76, § 3, provides: “The first license period under this act shall be from July 1, 2008 to December 31, 2009.
Thereafter each renewal period shall end on the date specified in W.S. 40-23-109(a).”

§ 40-23-110.
Surety bonds.

All licensees shall maintain a surety bond to the state of Wyoming in accordance with this section. The surety bond shall be used to cover individual loan originators employed or under contract with a licensee. The bond to be maintained shall be in the amount:

Until December 31, 2009, of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). This amount shall be increased by an additional sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each licensed office;

Effective January 1, 2010, as established by rule of the commissioner based upon the volume of business activity transacted by the licensee under this act.

The surety bond shall be a continuing obligation of the issuing surety. The surety’s liability under the bond for any claims made under the bond either individually or in the aggregate shall in no event exceed the face amount of the bond issued. The bond shall be issued by a surety authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming. The bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be placed on file with the commissioner.

In the event that a licensee or person employed by or under contract with a licensee has violated any of the provisions of this act or of a rule or order lawfully made pursuant to this act, or federal law or regulation pertaining to the mortgage lending or mortgage brokering, and has damaged any person by such violation, then the bond shall be forfeited and paid by the surety to the state of Wyoming for the benefit of any person so damaged, in an amount sufficient to satisfy the violation or the bond in its entirety if the violation exceeds the amount of the bond.

Surety bonds shall remain effective continuously until released in writing by the commissioner. If a bond has not been previously released by the commissioner, the bond shall expire two (2) years after the date of the surrender, revocation or expiration of the license.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added “, in an amount sufficient to satisfy the violation or the bond in its entirety if the violation exceeds the amount of the bond” at the end of (b); and added (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence in the introductory language of (a); designated the language beginning with “of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)” as (a)(i), designated the language following “for each licensed office” as (b), and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in (a)(i), added “Until December 31, 2009” at the beginning; added (a)(ii), and in (b), in the first sentence, inserted “surety” preceding “bond.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-111.
Examinations and investigations.

The commissioner may conduct examinations of any licensee under this act at intervals he deems necessary to determine compliance with this act and other applicable laws, rules and regulations.

The commissioner may at any time investigate the loans or business books and records of any licensee or person engaged in mortgage lending or mortgage brokering activities for the purpose of determining compliance with this act or securing information required under this act. For these purposes, the commissioner shall have free and reasonable access to the offices, places of business, books and records of the licensee.

If a licensee’s or person’s records are located outside this state, the licensee or person shall have the option to make them available to the commissioner at a convenient location within this state, or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the commissioner or his representative to examine them at the place where they are maintained. The commissioner may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on his behalf.

Each licensee or person subject to examination or investigation under this act shall pay to the commissioner an amount assessed by the commissioner to cover the direct and indirect cost of examinations or investigations conducted pursuant to this section not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per hour.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).

§ 40-23-112.
Records; confidentiality of records; exception.

Every licensee shall maintain records in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles in a manner that will enable the commissioner to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this act. The recordkeeping system of a licensee shall be sufficient if he makes the required information available. The records need not be kept in the place of business where residential mortgage loans are made, if the commissioner is given free access to the records wherever located. The records pertaining to any loan shall be retained for the period of twenty-five (25) months from the date of loan closing.

Except as provided in subsections (c) through (f) of this section, all information or reports obtained by the commissioner from an applicant or licensee are confidential.

The commissioner may disclose confidential information to mortgage lending or mortgage brokering supervisory agencies in other states or to federal regulatory authorities or to appropriate prosecuting attorneys.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating or information sharing agreements with any other supervisory agency or any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more mortgage lending or mortgage brokering supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of any office in Wyoming of an out-of-state licensee, and the commissioner may accept such parties’ reports of examination and reports of investigation in lieu of conducting his own examinations or investigations.

The commissioner may enter into contracts with any mortgage lending or mortgage brokering supervisory agency having concurrent jurisdiction over a Wyoming licensee pursuant to this act to engage the services of the agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation. Any such contract shall not be subject to the provisions of W.S. 9-2-3204(b).

Except as provided in P.L. 110-289, section 1512, the requirements under any federal law or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the registry. Such information and any other confidential material obtained by the commissioner may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or any state law.

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subsection (f) of this section shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena, discovery or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the registry with respect to such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives that privilege, in whole or in part.

Any Wyoming law relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in subsection (f) of this section that is inconsistent with subsection (f) of this section shall be superceded by the requirements of this section.

This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, any mortgage loan originator that is included in the registry for access by the public.

This section does not prohibit the commissioner from disclosing to the public a list of persons licensed under this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), substituted “subsections (c) through (f)” for “subsection (c)”; added (f) through (j) and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3204(b)" for "9-2-1016(b)" in the second sentence of (e).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-23-102(a)(xviii).